Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 47
LIVESTOCK - RUNNING AT LARGE

Cross references:

For estrays, see article 44 of this title 35.

Section

35-47-101. Horses and mules running at large.

It is unlawful for any owner, or the agent, lessee, bailee, or employee of such owner of any horses or mules, to knowingly permit any of said animals to run at large, within a distance of ten miles from any city having one hundred thousand or more population; within a distance of five miles of any city having between five thousand and thirty thousand population; within a distance of one mile of all other cities or towns; and within a distance of one mile from the business area of any unincorporated town or village; but nothing in this article shall prevent anyone from driving any of said animals to market or from pasture to pasture or prevent the use of horses or mules for riding, driving, or drawing animal-propelled vehicles or machinery. This article shall not affect any common used solely for grazing purposes which has been established by land grant and ratified by treaty.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 142, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-19-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-18-1.

Cross references:

For penalty for grazing on roads and in municipalities, see § 35-46-105; for powers of municipalities to restrain and impound estrays, see § 31-15-401 (1)(m).

35-47-102. Duty of custodian - fees - recovery.

Where said animals are in violation of section 35-47-101, it is the duty of every sheriff or other peace officer of the county, on complaint of any person, to take custody of such animals and place them on feed and water. He may appoint a custodian for such purpose and pay such custodian a fee of four dollars per day to be assessed as costs; and the owner or agent may give the sheriff or other officer a redelivery bond in sufficient sum for repossession of his stock, pending a court action. In cases where the owner or agent is known and has been convicted in court, the sheriff or other officer may dispose of such animals or sufficient numbers of them to pay for the fine and reasonable costs of feeding and other expenses in connection therewith, after giving ten days notice by posting three notices in public and conspicuous places. In cases where the owner of such animals is unknown, the animals shall be taken up and disposed of by the state board of stock inspection commissioners, or one of its duly authorized representatives, the same as other estrays as provided for by law.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 142, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 8-19-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-18-2.

35-47-103. Penalty.

Any person who knowingly permits any of said animals to run at large commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 143, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 8-19-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-18-3.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3283, § 646, effective March 1, 2022.